District of Columbia statutes.
42-1010

Liability of special and beneficial power in equity.

Every special and beneficial power shall be liable, in equity, to the claims of creditors, and the execution of the power may be decreed for the benefit of the creditors entitled.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1046

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-110.
1973 Ed., § 45-1010.